src/morphology/compounding.lexc
!! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ==========================================================================
!                     North Sámi morphological analyser                     
! ==========================================================================


! Prefixing and compounding
! =========================

LEXICON Prefixes
! ii-+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:ii-             Noun       ; !there is another path from noun-stems
! ii-+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:ii-             Adjective  ; ! ii-biologalaš
        Lulle-+Use/Circ:Lul^le-         ProperNoun ; ! Lulli-Trøndelaga etc.
        Lulli-+Use/Circ:Lul^li-         ProperNoun ;
  Lullinuorta-+Use/Circ:Lul^li^nuor^ta- ProperNoun ;
        Mátta-+Use/Circ:Mát^ta-         ProperNoun ;
        Davvi-+Use/Circ:Dav^vi-         ProperNoun ;
        Davve-+Use/Circ:Dav^ve-         ProperNoun ; ! 76 i korpus, 17 i leksikon
        Gaska-+Use/Circ:Gas^ka-         ProperNoun ;
       Vuolli-+Use/Circ:Vuol^li-        ProperNoun ;
       Vuolle-+Use/Circ:Vuol^le-        ProperNoun ;
        Badje-+Use/Circ:Bad^je-         ProperNoun ;
        Oarje-+Use/Circ:Oar^je-         ProperNoun ;
       Orjjel-+Use/Circ:Orj^jel-        ProperNoun ; ! Orjje 0 i korpus  orjjelsápmi
       Orjješ-+Use/Circ:Orj^ješ-        ProperNoun ;
       Nuorta-+Use/Circ:Nuor^ta-        ProperNoun ;
         Ođđa-+Use/Circ:Ođ^đa-          ProperNoun ;
         eahpe+Use/Circ:eah^pe😱#       Noun       ;
  eahpe+Use/NG+Use/Circ:eah^pe😱#       Adjective  ;
         eahpe+Use/Circ:eah^pe😱#       Verb       ;

!"<Jus fylkkaboazodoallostivra gávnnaha ahte>"
!"<Ođđa siidaoasi dohkkeheami biehttaleami>"

LEXICON R
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RAlmostReal ; ! Flags to control compounding

LEXICON RAlmostReal              ! lexicalising the 3-part compounds, with the tag ShCmp
           RrealAfterCmpNFlags ; ! Business as usual: Normal compounds right on to Rreal
 +Cmp#:😱# MiddleNouns         ; ! These nouns should not return to themselves, to avoid -jotjotjot-
                                 ! They thus point directly to Rreal.
 
LEXICON Rreal ! This is the former R lexicon, renamed to avoid the MiddleNouns loop
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RrealAfterCmpNFlags ; ! Flags to control compounding

LEXICON RrealAfterCmpNFlags ! This is the former R lexicon, renamed to avoid the MiddleNouns loop
                                          @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@😱#                Noun       ; ! This is the normal case.
                           @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@😱# Verb       ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
                           @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@😱# Adjective  ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation

                 @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@-                  Noun       ; ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so
  @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@-   Verb       ; ! Sem-julggaštus and maana-gåetie
  @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@-   Adjective  ; ! are allowed.

                                                  +Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:-                                                   Noun       ; ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so
                                   @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@-                                    Verb       ; ! Sem-julggaštus and maana-gåetie
                                   @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@-                                    Adjective  ; ! are allowed.

                    @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/SoftHyph+Err/Orth+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@­                   Noun       ; ! These 3 cases add a SOFT hyphen, to
     @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/SoftHyph+Err/Orth+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@­    Verb       ; ! make it possible to analyse certain texts
     @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/SoftHyph+Err/Orth+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@­    Adjective  ; ! from printing houses and newspapers.

! NB! ! ! The soft hyphens in the three last lines above are INVISIBLE! Even in SEE.
! There really IS a character in front of the space and the continuation lexicon.
! It is visible in tools like Emacs, UnicodeChecker and hexadecimal editors. DO NOT
! EDIT THESE LINES WIHTOUT THE PROPER TOOLS TO CHECK THAT ALL IS CORRECT!!!

                                        @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@-😱#              Acronym    ; ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
                                        @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@-😱#              CmpNumeral ; ! maana-123
                                        @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@-😱#              ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for non-hyph.
                                                                                                                                                  ! words. viessu-London goes through here.
                                         @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@-😱#               HyphNouns  ; ! Go to words requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-

                    +Cmp/SplitR@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/SpellNoSugg:-@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@                  ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

                                                     +Cmp/SplitR+Use/SpellNoSugg:-                                                   ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

!                                                                    +Use/-Spell:                                                    R-LAGAN    ; !This should not be Cmp

LEXICON RHyph ! Recursive lexicon from all classes REQUIRING a hyphen to follow.
              ! NBNBNB! ! ! The hyphen should be added here! NOT in the other lexicons!
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@@C.CmpHyph@ RHyphTags ; ! Flags to control compounding

LEXICON RHyphTags
                                     +Cmp-#:-😱#                Noun       ; ! This is the normal case.
                                     +Cmp-#:-😱#                HyphNouns  ; ! Go to nouns requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-
                      @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@-😱# Verb       ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
                      @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@-😱# Adjective  ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation
                                     +Cmp-#:-😱#                Acronym    ; ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
                                     +Cmp-#:-😱#                CmpNumeral ; ! NRK-2
                                     +Cmp-#:-😱#                ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for hyph-words.
                                                                             ! London-Hull is covered here, whereas Hull-viessu
                                                                             ! is covered by RHyph + Noun.
                +Cmp/SplitR+Use/SpellNoSugg:-                   ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

! Proper noun and other hyph word compounds WITHOUT hyphens are covered HERE
! and are marked +Err/Orth as well as +Cmp/NoHyph. Examples: LondonHull & viessuLondon.
! The lemma string is still given WITH the hyphen - we want identical lemma for both sub and norm.
!                +Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:😱#                 Noun       ; ! This is the normal case.
!                +Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:😱#                 HyphNouns  ; ! Go to nouns requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@😱#  Verb       ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@😱#  Adjective  ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation
!                +Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:😱#                 Acronym    ; ! maanatv, "lommecdspelar"
!                +Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:😱#                 CmpNumeral ; ! NRK2
!                +Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:😱#                 ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for hyph-words.


LEXICON RNum
      +Cmp-#:-😱# Noun ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num 


LEXICON Rnoun
               :%> Rreal  ; ! Going to the compound lexicon
 +Attr+Err/Orth:   ENDLEX ; ! Kárášjot, as independent (sub) word

LEXICON RProp                         !!≈ !!!@CODE@
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@            RPropTags ; ! Flags to control compounding
                                                                                         +Cmp-#namma:»»»-nammas DER-SAS   ;
 
LEXICON RPropTags !! A special lexicon for handling proper noun compounding without hyphens
                                       @C.CmpHyph@                                      RHyphTags ; !!≈ ; @CODE@ : This is the regular case, giving hyphens to compounds
 @D.CmpHyph.TRUE@@U.CmpHyph.FALSE@+Use/-Spell+Cmp#:@D.CmpHyph.TRUE@@U.CmpHyph.FALSE@😱# Noun      ; !!≈ ; @CODE@ : This is the special case, going directly to nouns (''not'' to NounRoot,
                                                                                                    !!             as that would allow compounding with words explicitly coded to disallow
                                                                                                    !!             such compounds)

LEXICON flagON-R
@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;

LEXICON flagOFF-R
@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;

!LEXICON R-LAGAN To be added as derivation
! +Der1+Der2+Der/laakan+Use/Circ+Use/-Spell:» LAGAN ; ! ! biilalágan, noaidelágán noaiddilágán beatnagalágán beanalágán all these goes
!                                                      ! Nielsen: beatnatlágán, beatnatlágáš, beanalágáš, giđalágáš, áhččelágáš,
! +Der1+Der2+Der/laagasj+Use/Circ+Use/-Spell:» LAGAS ; ! ! etc.
